Texas, session 892, HB86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 141.009.  STANDARDS. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall establish health and safety standards for youth camps. The standards may relate to: (1)  adequate and proper supervision at all times of camp activities; (2)  qualifications for directors, supervisors, and staff and sufficient numbers of those persons; (3)  proper safeguards for sanitation and public health; (4)  adequate medical services for personal health and first aid; (5)  proper procedures for food preparation, handling, and mass feeding; (6)  healthful and sufficient water supply; (7)  proper waste disposal; (8)  proper water safety procedures for swimming pools, lakes, and waterways; (9)  safe boating equipment; (10)  proper maintenance and safe use of motor vehicles; (11)  safe buildings and physical facilities; (12)  proper fire precautions; (13)  safe and proper recreational and other equipment; (14)  proper regard for density and use of the premises; and (15)  records of criminal convictions of camp personnel. (b)  In establishing health and safety standards under Subsection (a), the executive commissioner by rule shall require a youth camp to: (1)  post on or near all interior doors of each camp building that provides overnight accommodations to campers, at a height easily visible to campers and camp staff, an emergency evacuation and relocation map identifying: (A)  the shortest and easiest route for campers and camp staff from the building to a safe meeting point that provides shelter in an emergency; (B)  an alternative route from the building to the meeting point in the event the route described by Paragraph (A) is unavailable due to the emergency; and (C)  the location of emergency equipment; and (2)  provide instruction to all campers and camp staff before the first overnight stay of a camping session on: (A)  the routes to the camp's safe meeting point; (B)  the location of the camp's emergency equipment; (C)  the location of the camp's emergency evacuation and relocation maps; and (D)  implementation and use of the emergency evacuation and relocation maps. SECTION 2.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, as amended by this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.